Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-629
Transaction, defined.

Transaction means an action or set of actions occurring between two or more persons relating to the conduct of business, commercial, or governmental affairs.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 391.